Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Chapter 3. Code Charters

§ 21-3-1.
Adoption of code charter.

Any municipality not now operating under a “Code Charter” may acquire such charter and come under the provisions of this chapter by a majority vote of the electors therein, cast at a general or special election held for such purpose. At such election, the propositions to be voted on shall be “FOR THE CODE CHARTER” and “AGAINST THE CODE CHARTER.” If a majority of the legal votes cast are in favor of adopting the code charter, then the municipality shall be subject to and governed by all the following provisions of this chapter, and the result of the election shall be certified to the secretary of state, who shall make a record of same in his office. If a majority of the votes cast shall be against the code charter, the municipal authorities shall so enter of record, and another election submitting the question shall not be held within four years thereafter. After the rejection of the provisions of the code charter by a municipality, and until its acceptance thereof as herein provided, the corporate powers, rights and franchises thereof shall be and remain as now provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-34; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 34, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-3-3.
Elective officers; certain officers may be appointive.

The elective officers of all municipalities operating under a code charter shall be the mayor, the aldermen, municipal judge, the marshal or chief of police, the tax collector and the tax assessor. From and after July 1, 2017, the governing authorities of the municipality shall appoint a city or town clerk who shall likewise serve as an officer of the municipality. However, the governing authorities of the municipality shall have the power, by ordinance, to combine the office of clerk or marshal with the office of tax collector and/or tax assessor. Such governing authorities shall have the further power to provide that all or any of such officers, except those of mayor and aldermen, shall be appointive, in which case the marshal or chief of police, the tax collector, the tax assessor, and the city or town clerk, or such of such officers as may be made appointive, shall be appointed by the governing authorities. Any action taken by the governing authorities to make any of such offices appointive shall be by ordinance of such municipality, and no such ordinance shall be adopted within ninety (90) days prior to any regular general election for the election of municipal officers. No such ordinance shall become effective during the term of office of any officer whose office shall be affected thereby. If any such office is made appointive, the person appointed thereto shall hold office at the pleasure of the governing authorities and may be discharged by such governing authorities at any time, either with or without cause, and it shall be discretionary with the governing authorities whether or not to require such person appointed thereto to reside within the corporate limits of the municipality in order to hold such office.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2978; 1906, § 3375; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5903; 1930, § 2511; 1942, § 3374-35; Laws, 1904, ch. 156; Laws, 1910, ch. 201; Laws, 1934, ch. 315; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 35; Laws, 1952, chs. 362, 363; Laws, 1966, Ex Sess, ch. 42, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 488; Laws, 2016, ch. 507, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 21-3-5.
Appointive officers.

From and after the expiration of the terms of office of present municipal officers, the mayor and board of aldermen of all municipalities operating under this chapter shall have the power and authority to appoint a street commissioner, and such other officers and employees as may be necessary, and to prescribe the duties and fix the compensation of all such officers and employees. All officers and employees so appointed shall hold office at the pleasure of the governing authorities and may be discharged by such governing authorities at any time, either with or without cause. The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power and authority, in their discretion, to appoint the same person to any two (2) or more of the appointive offices, and in a municipality having a population of less than fifteen thousand (15,000), according to the latest available federal census, a member of the board of aldermen may be appointed to the office of street commissioner. In municipalities not having depositories, the clerk shall serve as ex officio treasurer. The municipal governing authorities shall require all officers and employees handling or having the custody of any public funds of such city to give bond, with sufficient surety, to be payable, conditioned and approved as provided by law, in an amount to be determined by the governing authority (which shall be not less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00)), the premium on same to be paid from the municipal treasury. The terms of office or employment of all officers and employees so appointed shall expire at the expiration of the term of office of the governing authorities making the appointment, unless such officers or employees shall have been sooner discharged as herein provided. All officers and employees so appointed are authorized to serve until the appointment and qualification of their successors not exceeding the limitation period provided in Section 21-15-41.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-37; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 37; Laws, 1984, ch. 409; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 22; Laws, 1988, ch. 488, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 467, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2009; Laws, 2018, ch. 376, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 21-3-7.
Number of aldermen and their election.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, in all municipalities having a population of less than ten thousand (10,000) according to the latest available federal census, there shall be five (5) aldermen, which aldermen may be elected from the municipality at large, or, in the discretion of the municipal authority, the municipality may be divided into four (4) wards, with one (1) alderman to be selected from each ward and one (1) from the municipality at large. On a petition of twenty percent (20%) of the qualified electors of any such municipality, the provisions of this section as to whether or not the aldermen shall be elected from wards or from the municipality at large shall be determined by the vote of the majority of the qualified electors of the municipality voting in a special election called for that purpose. All aldermen shall be selected by vote of the entire electorate of the municipality. Those municipalities which determine to select one (1) alderman from each of the four (4) wards shall select one (1) from the candidates for alderman from each particular ward who shall be a resident of said ward by majority vote of the entire electorate of the municipality.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, in all municipalities having a population of ten thousand (10,000) or more, according to the latest available federal census, there shall be seven (7) aldermen, which aldermen may be elected from the municipality at large, or, in the discretion of the municipal authority, the municipality may be divided into six (6) wards, with one (1) alderman to be selected from each ward and one (1) from the municipality at large. On a petition of twenty percent (20%) of the qualified electors of any such municipality, the provisions of this section as to whether or not the aldermen shall be elected from wards or from the municipality at large shall be determined by the vote of the majority of the qualified electors of the municipality voting in a special election called for that purpose. This section in no way affects the number of aldermen, councilmen, or commissioners of any city operating under a special charter. All aldermen shall be selected by vote of the entire electorate of the municipality. Those municipalities which determine to select one (1) alderman from each of the six (6) wards shall select one (1) of the candidates for alderman from each particular ward by majority vote of the entire electorate of the municipality.

In any municipality having a population of five hundred (500) or less according to the latest available federal census, there may be three (3) aldermen. The change from five (5) aldermen to three (3) aldermen shall be approved by a majority of the qualified electors of the municipality voting in a special election held for this purpose.

If a municipality has a population according to the 2010 federal decennial census that is less than ten thousand (10,000) and whose population according to the 2020 federal decennial census is ten thousand (10,000) or more, the municipality may elect to continue with five (5) aldermen and not increase to seven (7) aldermen by the adoption of a resolution by a majority of the board of aldermen expressing the intent to continue with five (5) aldermen and not increase to seven (7) aldermen. Before the adoption of such resolution, the proposed resolution shall be published for three (3) consecutive weeks in at least one (1) newspaper published in the municipality. The first publication of such resolution shall be made not less than twenty-one (21) days prior to the date fixed in such resolution for the adoption of the same and the last publication shall be made not more than seven (7) days prior to such date. If no newspaper be published in the municipality, then such notice shall be given by publishing the resolution for the required time in some newspaper having a general circulation in such municipality and, in addition, by posting a copy of such resolution for at least twenty-one (21) days next preceding the date fixed to adopt the resolution at three (3) public places in such municipality. If ten percent (10%) of the qualified electors of the municipality or fifteen hundred (1,500) whichever is lesser, shall file a written protest against the resolution on or before the date specified in the resolution, then an election on the question shall be called. Notice of such election shall be signed by the clerk of the municipality and shall be published once a week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks in at least one (1) newspaper published in the municipality. The first publication of such notice shall be made not less than twenty-one (21) days prior to the date fixed for such election and the last publication shall be made not more than seven (7) days prior to such date. If no newspaper be published in the municipality, then such notice shall be given by publishing the same for the required time in some newspaper having a general circulation in such municipality and, in addition, by posting a copy of such notice for at least twenty-one (21) days next preceding the date fixed to adopt the resolution at three (3) public places in such municipality. At the election, all qualified electors of such municipality may vote, and the ballots used in the election shall have printed thereon a brief statement of the purpose of the increase in the number of aldermen and the words “FOR THE INCREASE IN THE NUMBER OF ALDERMEN FROM 5 TO 7” and on a separate line, “AGAINST THE INCREASE IN NUMBER OF ALDERMEN FROM 5 TO 7” and the voters shall vote by placing a cross (X) or check (Π) opposite their choice on the proposition. The results of the election shall be certified by the municipal election commissions and spread on the minutes of the municipality. If a majority of electors who voted in the election vote in favor of maintaining five (5) aldermen and not increasing the number to seven (7) aldermen, the number of aldermen shall remain at five (5) and shall not be increased except by special election called for such purpose. If a majority of electors who voted in the election vote against maintaining five (5) aldermen and in favor of increasing the number to seven (7) aldermen, the number of aldermen for such municipality shall be increased to seven (7) aldermen and the number shall not be decreased except by act of the Legislature.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-36; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 36; Laws, 1962, ch. 537; Laws, 2016, ch. 365, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2018, ch. 329, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 21-3-9.
Qualifications of mayor and aldermen.

The mayor and members of the board of aldermen shall be qualified electors of the municipality and, in addition, the aldermen elected from and by wards shall be residents of their respective wards.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, §§ 2987, 2988; 1906, §§ 3385, 3386; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 5913, 5914; 1930, §§ 2521, 2522; 1942, § 3374-42; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 42, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-3-11.
Office of alderman or mayor vacated by removal of residence.

If any person elected as an alderman from a particular ward shall remove his residence from said ward, his office shall automatically be vacated, and if the mayor or any alderman elected from the municipality at large shall remove his residence from such municipality, the office shall likewise automatically be vacated. The vacancy shall be declared by the mayor and board of aldermen in the case of an alderman and by the board of aldermen in the case of a mayor, and such vacancy shall be filled in the manner prescribed by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 3376; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5904; 1930, § 2512; 1942, § 3374-38; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 38, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-3-13.
Mayor pro tempore.

The board of aldermen shall elect from among its members a mayor pro tempore, who shall serve in the place of the mayor in cases of temporary absence or disability of the mayor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3417, 3374-39; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 39, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-3-15.
Duties of the mayor; authority of the board of aldermen.

The mayor shall preside at all meetings of the board of aldermen, and in case there shall be an equal division, shall give the deciding vote. The executive power of the municipality shall be exercised by the mayor, and the mayor shall have the superintending control of all the officers and affairs of the municipality, and shall take care that the laws and ordinances are executed.

The legislative power of the municipality shall be exercised by the board of aldermen by a vote within a legally called meeting. No member of the board of aldermen shall give orders to any employee or subordinate of a municipality other than the alderman’s personal staff.

Ordinances adopted by the board of aldermen shall be submitted to the mayor. The mayor shall, within ten (10) days after receiving any ordinance, either approve the ordinance by affixing his signature thereto, or return it to the board of aldermen by delivering it to the municipal clerk together with a written statement setting forth his objections thereto or to any item or part thereof. No ordinance or any item or part thereof shall take effect without the mayor’s approval, unless the mayor fails to return an ordinance to the board of aldermen prior to the next meeting of the board, but no later than fifteen (15) days after it has been presented to him, or unless the board of aldermen, upon reconsideration thereof on or after the third day following its return by the mayor, shall, by a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the members of the board, resolve to override the mayor’s veto.

The term “ordinance” as used in this section shall be deemed to include ordinances, resolutions and orders.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2979; 1906, § 3377; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5905; 1930, § 2513; 1942, § 3374-40; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 40; Laws, 1982, ch. 472; Laws, 2006, ch. 333, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 435, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 21-3-17.
Signing of commissions and appointments; approval of bonds.

The mayor shall sign the commissions and appointments of all officers elected and appointed by the mayor and board of aldermen. Such commissions and appointments shall be attested by the clerk. The refusal, failure or neglect of the mayor to sign such commissions and appointments, or the refusal, failure or neglect of the clerk to attest same, shall not affect the validity of the acts of such officer when the minutes show the election or appointment was regularly had or made by the board. All bonds payable to the municipality shall be approved by the mayor and clerk.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2980; 1906, § 3378; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5906; 1930, § 2514; 1942, § 3374-41; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 41, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-3-19.
Regular meetings of board of aldermen; recess of meetings; quorum.

The mayor and board of aldermen shall hold regular meetings the first Tuesday of each month at such place and hour as may be fixed by ordinance, and may, on a date fixed by ordinance, hold a second regular meeting in each month at the same place established for the first regular meeting provided the second meeting shall be held at a day and hour fixed by the ordinance which shall be not less than two (2) weeks from the first day of the first regular meeting and not more than three (3) weeks from the date thereof. When a regular meeting of the mayor and board of aldermen shall fall upon a holiday, the mayor and board shall meet the following day. The mayor and board may recess either meeting from time to time to convene on a day fixed by an order of the mayor and board entered on its minutes, and may transact any business coming before it for consideration. In all cases it shall require a majority of all aldermen to constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The quorum required by this section may be established by teleconference or video means as provided in Section 25-41-5(2).

The mayor and board of aldermen may, pursuant to Section 21-17-17, set a day other than Tuesday for the holding of their regular monthly meeting.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2989; 1906, § 3387; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5915; 1930, § 2523; 1942, § 3374-43; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 43; Laws, 1960, ch. 423; Laws, 1973, ch. 324, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 403, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 442, § 2; Laws, 2017, ch. 319, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 21-3-21.
Special meetings of board of aldermen.

The mayor or any two (2) aldermen may, by written notice, call a special meeting of the mayor and board of aldermen for the transaction of important business. The notice must state the time of meeting and distinctly specify the subject matters of business to be acted upon and be signed by the officer or officers calling the meeting. Notice of the meeting shall be given to the members of the board, including the mayor, who have not signed it and who can be found, at least three (3) hours before the time fixed for the meeting. The method of notice shall be entered on the minutes of the special meeting, and business not specified therein shall not be transacted at the meeting. A member of the board shall not receive pay for attending a special meeting.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2990; 1906, § 3388; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5916; 1930, § 2524; 1942, § 3374-44; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 44; Laws, 2004, ch. 320, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 21-3-23.
Duties of street commissioner.

The street commissioner shall, under the direction of the mayor and board of aldermen, have general control of the streets, alleys, avenues, and sidewalks. He shall see that they are always in proper repair. He shall have the same worked, repaired, altered, paved, lighted, sprinkled, and everything else done that ought to be done to keep the same in good repair and condition, and shall perform all other duties that may be required of him by ordinance.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3000; 1906, § 3397; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5925; 1930, § 2534; 1942, § 3374-45; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 45, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-3-25.
Chief administrative officer.

Any municipality operating under a “Code Charter” as provided for in Chapter 3, Title 21, Mississippi Code of 1972, may through the mayor and board of aldermen, establish the position of chief administrative officer of the municipality.

The establishment of the position of chief administrative officer shall be by ordinance, and shall require a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the mayor and board of aldermen. Any action taken by the governing authorities to establish such office shall not be adopted within ninety (90) days prior to any regular general election for the election of municipal officers. The chief administrative officer shall be a full time employee of the municipality and shall serve at the discretion of the mayor and board of aldermen. He shall receive such compensation as the mayor and board of aldermen may determine, and shall be chosen solely on the basis of experience and administrative qualifications. The chief administrative officer may hold one (1) or more other appointive positions in the municipality. No person elected to the board of aldermen shall be eligible for the office of chief administrative officer during the term for which such person was elected.

The chief administrative officer shall have such administrative duties and functions as shall be delegated to him by the mayor and board of aldermen.

Following the adoption of an ordinance pursuant to this section, the position of chief administrative officer shall not be established until after the next general municipal election, at which time the first chief administrative officer will be appointed.

Members of the board of aldermen shall have no administrative powers or duties which are delegated by ordinance to the chief administrative officer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 327, eff from and after passage (approved April 22, 1976).